Illinois, session 104th, SB1983.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Sections 514A-15, 14A-30, and 14A-35 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/14A-15)7    Sec. 14A-15. Purpose. The purpose of this Article is to 8provide encouragement, assistance, and guidance to school 9districts in the development and improvement of educational 10programs for gifted and talented children and children 11eligible for accelerated placement as defined in Sections 1214A-20 and 14A-17 of this Code. School districts shall 13continue to have the authority and flexibility to design 14education programs for gifted and talented children in 15response to community needs, but these programs must comply 16with the requirements established in Section 14A-30 of this 17Code by no later than September 1, 2006 in order to merit 18approval by the State Board of Education in order to qualify 19for State funding for the education of gifted and talented 20children, should such funding become available.21(Source: P.A. 100-421, eff. 7-1-18.) 22    (105 ILCS 5/14A-30)  SB1983 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 09170 LNS 19226 b1    Sec. 14A-30. Local Funding of local gifted education 2programs. A local program for the education of gifted and 3talented children may include, but need not be limited to, be 4approved for funding by the State Board of Education, pursuant 5to a request for proposals process, if funds for that purpose 6are available and, beginning with the beginning of the 72010-2011 academic year, if the local program submits an 8application for funds that includes a comprehensive plan (i) 9showing that the applicant is capable of meeting a portion of 10the following requirements, (ii) showing the program elements 11currently in place and a timeline for implementation of other 12elements, and (iii) demonstrating to the satisfaction of the 13State Board of Education that the applicant is capable of 14implementing a program of gifted education consistent with 15this Article:16        (1) The use of assessment instruments, such as 17    nonverbal ability tests and tests in students' native 18    languages, and a selection process that is equitable to 19    and inclusive of underrepresented groups, including 20    low-income students, minority students, students with 21    disabilities, twice-exceptional students, and English 22    learners.23        (2) (Blank). A priority emphasis on language arts and 24    mathematics.25        (3) The use of multiple valid assessments that assess 26    both demonstrated achievement and potential for   SB1983 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 09170 LNS 19226 b1    achievement, including cognitive ability tests and general 2    or subject specific achievement tests, applied universally 3    to all students, and appropriate for the content focus of 4    the gifted services that will be provided. School 5    districts and schools may add other local, valid 6    assessments, such as portfolios. Assessments and selection 7    processes must ensure multiple pathways into the program.8        (4) The use of score ranges on assessments that are 9    appropriate for the school or district population, 10    including the use of local norms for achievement to 11    identify high potential students.12        (5) A process of identification of gifted and talented 13    children that is of equal rigor in each area of aptitude 14    addressed by the program.15        (6) The use of identification procedures that 16    appropriately correspond with the planned programs, 17    curricula, and services.18        (7) A fair and equitable decision-making process.19        (8) The availability of a fair and impartial appeal 20    process within the school, school district, or cooperative 21    of school districts operating a program for parents or 22    guardians whose children are aggrieved by a decision of 23    the school, school district, or cooperative of school 24    districts regarding eligibility for participation in a 25    program.26        (9) Procedures for annually informing the community   SB1983 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 09170 LNS 19226 b1    at-large, including parents, about the program and the 2    methods used for the identification of gifted and talented 3    children.4        (10) Procedures for notifying parents or guardians of 5    a child of a decision affecting that child's participation 6    in a program.7        (11) A description of how gifted and talented children 8    will be grouped and instructed in order to maximize the 9    educational benefits the children derive from 10    participation in the program, including curriculum 11    modifications and options that accelerate and add depth 12    and complexity to the curriculum content.13        (12) An explanation of how the program emphasizes 14    higher-level skills attainment, including 15    problem-solving, critical thinking, creative thinking, and 16    research skills, as embedded within relevant content 17    areas.18        (13) A methodology for measuring academic growth for 19    gifted and talented children and a procedure for 20    communicating a child's progress to his or her parents or 21    guardian, including, but not limited to, a report card.22        (14) The collection of data on growth in learning for 23    children in a program for gifted and talented children and 24    the reporting of the data to the State Board of Education.25        (15) The designation of a supervisor responsible for 26    overseeing the educational program for gifted and talented   SB1983 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 09170 LNS 19226 b1    children.2        (16) A showing that the certified teachers who are 3    assigned to teach gifted and talented children understand 4    the characteristics and educational needs of children and 5    are able to differentiate the curriculum and apply 6    instructional methods to meet the needs of the children.7        (17) Plans for the continuation of professional 8    development for staff assigned to the program serving 9    gifted and talented children.10(Source: P.A. 99-706, eff. 7-29-16.) 11    (105 ILCS 5/14A-35)12    Sec. 14A-35. Administrative functions of the State Board 13of Education for gifted and talented children programs. 14    (a) The State Board of Education must designate a staff 15person who shall be in charge of educational programs for 16gifted and talented children. This staff person shall, at a 17minimum, (i) be responsible for developing an approval process 18for educational programs for gifted and talented children by 19no later than September 1, 2006, (ii) receive and maintain the 20written descriptions of all programs for gifted and talented 21children in the State, (iii) collect and maintain the annual 22growth in learning data submitted by a school, school 23district, or cooperative of school districts, (iv) identify 24potential funding sources for the education of gifted and 25talented children, and (v) serve as the main contact person at   SB1983 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 09170 LNS 19226 b1the State Board of Education for program supervisors and other 2school officials, parents, and other stakeholders regarding 3the education of gifted and talented children.4    (b) Subject to the availability of funds for these 5purposes, the State Board of Education may perform a variety 6of additional administrative functions with respect to the 7education of gifted and talented children, including, but not 8limited to, supervision, quality assurance, compliance 9monitoring, and oversight of local programs, analysis of 10performance outcome data submitted by local educational 11agencies, the establishment of personnel standards, and a 12program of personnel development for teachers and 13administrative personnel in the education of gifted and 14talented children. 15(Source: P.A. 100-421, eff. 7-1-18.)